District of Columbia statutes.
7-1204.02

Civil commitment proceedings.

Mental health information may be disclosed by a mental health professional when and to the extent necessary to initiate or seek civil commitment proceedings under § 21-541.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 402, 25 DCR 5055
1981 Ed., § 6-2032.
1973 Ed., § 6-1629.